Illinois, session 104th, SB3515.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-65 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-65)7    Sec. 15-65. Charitable purposes. All property of the 8following is exempt when actually and exclusively used for 9charitable or beneficent purposes, and not leased or otherwise 10used with a view to profit:11        (a) Institutions of public charity. As used in this 12    subsection (a), "institution of public charity" includes a 13    not-for-profit organization that is organized and operated 14    primarily as an entrepreneurial support organization and 15    that supports, mentors, and trains entrepreneurs, provided 16    the applicant provides: (i) affirmative evidence that the 17    organization is an exempt organization under Section 18    501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or its successor 19    and (ii) affirmative evidence that the property is used 20    for the provision of services typically provided by 21    entrepreneurial support organizations, including, but not 22    limited to, programming, educational facilities, and 23    community and networking resources.   SB3515- 2 -LRB104 19336 JDS 32783 b1        The General Assembly may set a monetary or quantum 2    standard in determining what constitutes an adequate 3    amount of charitable activity necessary to satisfy the 4    test for a charitable property tax exemption. An 5    entrepreneurial support organization shall satisfy the 6    conditions for a property tax exemption with respect to 7    any of its properties and shall be issued a charitable 8    exemption for that property if the value of charitable 9    services or activities provided by the entrepreneurial 10    support organization using the property during the 11    relevant year equals or exceeds the estimated property tax 12    liability of the property for the year for which an 13    exemption is sought.14        (b) Beneficent and charitable organizations 15    incorporated in any state of the United States, including 16    organizations whose owner, and no other person, uses the 17    property exclusively for the distribution, sale, or resale 18    of donated goods and related activities and uses all the 19    income from those activities to support the charitable, 20    religious or beneficent activities of the owner, whether 21    or not such activities occur on the property.22        (c) Old people's homes, facilities for persons with a 23    developmental disability, and not-for-profit 24    organizations providing services or facilities related to 25    the goals of educational, social and physical development, 26    if, upon making application for the exemption, the   SB3515- 3 -LRB104 19336 JDS 32783 b1    applicant provides affirmative evidence that the home or 2    facility or organization is an exempt organization under 3    paragraph (3) of Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue 4    Code or its successor, and either: (i) the bylaws of the 5    home or facility or not-for-profit organization provide 6    for a waiver or reduction, based on an individual's 7    ability to pay, of any entrance fee, assignment of assets, 8    or fee for services, or (ii) the home or facility is 9    qualified, built or financed under Section 202 of the 10    National Housing Act of 1959, as amended.11        An applicant that has been granted an exemption under 12    this subsection on the basis that its bylaws provide for a 13    waiver or reduction, based on an individual's ability to 14    pay, of any entrance fee, assignment of assets, or fee for 15    services may be periodically reviewed by the Department to 16    determine if the waiver or reduction was a past policy or 17    is a current policy. The Department may revoke the 18    exemption if it finds that the policy for waiver or 19    reduction is no longer current.20        If a not-for-profit organization leases property that 21    is otherwise exempt under this subsection to an 22    organization that conducts an activity on the leased 23    premises that would entitle the lessee to an exemption 24    from real estate taxes if the lessee were the owner of the 25    property, then the leased property is exempt.26        (d) Not-for-profit health maintenance organizations   SB3515- 4 -LRB104 19336 JDS 32783 b1    certified by the Director of the Illinois Department of 2    Insurance under the Health Maintenance Organization Act, 3    including any health maintenance organization that 4    provides services to members at prepaid rates approved by 5    the Illinois Department of Insurance if the membership of 6    the organization is sufficiently large or of indefinite 7    classes so that the community is benefited by its 8    operation. No exemption shall apply to any hospital or 9    health maintenance organization which has been adjudicated 10    by a court of competent jurisdiction to have denied 11    admission to any person because of race, color, creed, sex 12    or national origin.13        (e) All free public libraries.14        (f) Historical societies.15    Property otherwise qualifying for an exemption under this 16Section shall not lose its exemption because the legal title 17is held (i) by an entity that is organized solely to hold that 18title and that qualifies under paragraph (2) of Section 501(c) 19of the Internal Revenue Code or its successor, whether or not 20that entity receives rent from the charitable organization for 21the repair and maintenance of the property, (ii) by an entity 22that is organized as a partnership or limited liability 23company, in which the charitable organization, or an affiliate 24or subsidiary of the charitable organization, is a general 25partner of the partnership or managing member of the limited 26liability company, for the purposes of owning and operating a   SB3515- 5 -LRB104 19336 JDS 32783 b1residential rental property that has received an allocation of 2Low Income Housing Tax Credits for 100% of the dwelling units 3under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 4amended, or (iii) for any assessment year including and 5subsequent to January 1, 1996 for which an application for 6exemption has been filed and a decision on which has not become 7final and nonappealable, by a limited liability company 8organized under the Limited Liability Company Act provided 9that (A) the limited liability company's sole member or 10members, as that term is used in Section 1-5 of the Limited 11Liability Company Act, are the institutions of public charity 12that actually and exclusively use the property for charitable 13and beneficent purposes; and (B) the limited liability company 14does not lease the property or otherwise use it with a view to 15profit.16    The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th 17General Assembly are declarative of existing law and shall be 18applied retroactively where substantively applicable, 19including all pending actions without regard to when the cause 20of action accrued. 21(Source: P.A. 103-954, eff. 8-9-24.)